Florida, session 2026, HB1151.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 381.0026, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
381.0026 Reproductive freedom.—
(1) SHORT TITLE.—This section may be cited as the
"Reproductive Freedom Act."
(2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Abortion" means any medical treatment intended to
induce the termination of a pregnancy. The term does not include
management of or care for a miscarriage.
(b) "Pregnancy" means the human reproductive process
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1151-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1151 2026
beginning with an implanted human embryo.
(c) "Reproductive health care" means health care offered,
arranged, or furnished for the purpose of preventing pregnancy,
terminating a pregnancy, managing pregnancy loss, or improving
maternal health. The term includes, but is not limited to,
contraception, sterilization, preconception care, maternity
care, abortion care, family planning, and fertility services.
(3) FUNDAMENTAL RIGHT TO REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH CARE.—The
State Constitution establishes the principles of individual
liberty, personal privacy, and equality. The Legislature finds
that such principles ensure the fundamental right to
reproductive health care. Notwithstanding chapter 390 and any
other law, the right to reproductive health care includes, but
is not limited to, all of the following rights and protections:
(a) Every individual has a fundamental right to make
autonomous decisions about the individual's own reproductive
health, including the right to use or refuse reproductive health
care.
(b) Every individual who becomes pregnant has a
fundamental right to choose whether to continue the pregnancy
and give birth or to obtain an abortion and to make autonomous
decisions about how to exercise this fundamental right.
(c) The state may not deny or interfere with an
individual's fundamental right to access reproductive health
care.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1151-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1151 2026
(4) HARASSMENT, DISCRIMINATION, CIVIL LIABILITY, AND
PROSECUTION FOR REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH CARE PROHIBITED.—
(a) State or local law enforcement agencies or officials
may not harass or discriminate against an individual for
providing or obtaining reproductive health care or assisting
another person in doing so.
(b) State or local law enforcement agencies or officials
may not penalize, prosecute, or otherwise take adverse action
against individuals based on such individual's own exercise of
the fundamental rights under this section or such individual's
own actual, potential, perceived, or alleged pregnancy outcomes,
including miscarriage, stillbirth, or abortion. State and local
law enforcement agencies and officials may not penalize,
prosecute, or otherwise take adverse action against any
individual for aiding or assisting another individual in
exercising that other individual's right to reproductive health
care with voluntary consent.
(c) An individual may not be subject to civil liability
for exercising the individual's fundamental rights under this
section. An individual who aids or assists another individual in
exercising the fundamental rights under this section may not be
subject to civil liability for his or her actions in aiding or
assisting in the exercise of such fundamental rights.
(d) A fertilized egg, embryo, or fetus does not have
100 independent rights under the laws of this state.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1151-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1151 2026
101 (5) LIMITATION.—A local unit of government may not
102 regulate an individual's ability to freely exercise the
103 fundamental right to reproductive health care in a manner that
104 is more restrictive than that set forth in this section.
105 (6) APPLICABILITY.—This section applies to all state and
106 local laws, ordinances, regulations, rules, policies,
107 procedures, practices, and government actions.
108 (7) CONSTRUCTION.—This section supersedes any provision of
109 chapter 390 in conflict with this section.
110 (8) SEVERABILITY.—If any provision of this section or its
111 application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
112 invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of
113 the section which can be given effect without the invalid
114 provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this
115 section are severable.
116 Section 2. Section 286.31, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
117 Section 3. Section 381.00321, Florida Statutes, is
118 repealed.
119 Section 4. Section 765.113, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
120 Section 5. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1151-00